test/src/gt-norm-yamls/U-all_gt-norm.yaml
  Verb - tehđa - ok: # Verb 'to do' - ok
     tehđä+V+Inf: tehđä
     tehđä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tehen
     tehđä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: tehet
     tehđä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tekkee
     tehđä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: tehemä
     tehđä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: tehettä
     tehđä+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tehđhään
     tehđä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tehin
     tehđä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: tehit
     tehđä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: teki
     tehđä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: tehimä
     tehđä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: tehittä
     tehđä+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: tehthiin
     tehđä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: tehny
     tehđä+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Nom: tehty
     tehđä+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: tehnheet
     tehđä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: tekkeevä
     tehđä+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: tekkeevät
     tehđä+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: tehtävä
     tehđä+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: tehtävät
 
     tehđä+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: tekisin
     tehđä+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: tekisit
     tehđä+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: tekis
     tehđä+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: tekisimmä
     tehđä+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: tekisittä
     tehđä+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: tehtäis
     tehđä+V+Pass+Cond: tehtäis
     
     tehđä+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: tehe
     tehđä+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: tehkää
     
     tehđä+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: tekemässä
     tehđä+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: tekemästä
     tehđä+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: tekemhään
     tehđä+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: tekemällä
     tehđä+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: tekemättä

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - tohtiit - ok: # Verb 'to bring' - 
     tohtiit+V+Inf: tohtiit
     tohtiit+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tohđin
     tohtiit+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: tohđit
     tohtiit+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tohtii
     tohtiit+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: tohđima
     tohtiit+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: tohđitta
     tohtiit+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tohđithaan
     tohtiit+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tohđin
     tohtiit+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: tohđit
     tohtiit+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: tohti
     tohtiit+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: tohđima
     tohtiit+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: tohđitta
     tohtiit+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: tohđithiin
     tohtiit+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: tohtinu
     tohtiit+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Nom: tohđittu
     tohtiit+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: tohtinheet
     tohtiit+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: tohtiiva
     tohtiit+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: tohtiivat
     tohtiit+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: tohđittava
     tohtiit+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: tohđittavat

     tohtiit+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: tohtisin
     tohtiit+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: tohtisit
     tohtiit+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: tohtis
     tohtiit+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: tohtisimma
     tohtiit+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: tohtisitta
     tohtiit+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: tohđittais
     tohtiit+V+Pass+Cond: tohđittais

     tohtiit+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: tohđi
     tohtiit+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: tohtikkaa
     
     tohtiit+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: tohtimassa
     tohtiit+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: tohtimasta
     tohtiit+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: tohtimhaan
     tohtiit+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: tohtimalla
     tohtiit+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: tohtimatta
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - tulla - ok: # Verb 'to bring'
     tulla+V+Inf: tulla
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tulen
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: tulet
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tullee
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: tulema
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: tuletta
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tulhaan
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tulin
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: tulit
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: tuli
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: tulima
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: tulitta
     tulla+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: tulthiin
     tulla+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: tullu
     tulla+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Nom: tultu
     tulla+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: tulheet
     tulla+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: tulleeva
     tulla+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: tulleevat
     tulla+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: tultava
     tulla+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: tultavat
     
     tulla+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: tulisin
     tulla+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: tulisit
     tulla+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: tulis
     tulla+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: tulisimma
     tulla+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: tulisitta
     tulla+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: tultais
     tulla+V+Pass+Cond: tultais

     tulla+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: tule
     tulla+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: tulkkaa
     
     tulla+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: tulemassa
     tulla+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: tulemasta
     tulla+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: tulemhaan
     tulla+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: tulemalla
     tulla+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: tulematta
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - tuođa - ei tsekattu: # Verb 'to bring' 
     tuođa+V+Inf: tuođa
     tuođa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tuon
     tuođa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: tuot
     tuođa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tuopi
     tuođa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: tuoma
     tuođa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: tuotta
     tuođa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tuođhaan
     tuođa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: toin
     tuođa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: toit
     tuođa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: toi
     tuođa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: toima
     tuođa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: toitta
     tuođa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: tuothiin
     tuođa+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: tuonu
     tuođa+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Nom: tuotu
     tuođa+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: tuonheet
     tuođa+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: tuova
     tuođa+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: tuovat
     tuođa+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: tuotava
     tuođa+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: tuotavat
     
     tuođa+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: toisin
     tuođa+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: toisit
     tuođa+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: tois
     tuođa+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: toisima
     tuođa+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: toisitta
     tuođa+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: tuotais
     tuođa+V+Pass+Cond: tuotais 
     
     tuođa+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: tuo
     tuođa+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: tuokkaa
     
     tuođa+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: tuomassa
     tuođa+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: tuomasta
     tuođa+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: tuomhaan
     tuođa+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: tuomala
     tuođa+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: tuomatta
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - vanheta - ok: # Verb 'to bring'
     vanheta+V+Inf: vanheta
     vanheta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vanhenen
     vanheta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: vanhenet
     vanheta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vanhenee
     vanheta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: vanhenemma
     vanheta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: vanhenetta
     vanheta+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vanhethaan
     vanheta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vanhenin
     vanheta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: vanhenit
     vanheta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vanheni
     vanheta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: vanhenimma
     vanheta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: vanhenitta
     vanheta+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vanhethiin
     vanheta+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: vanhenu
     vanheta+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Nom: vanhettu
     vanheta+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: vanhenheet
     vanheta+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: vanheneeva
     vanheta+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: vanheneevat
     vanheta+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: vanhettava
     vanheta+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: vanhettavat
     
     vanheta+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: vanhenisin
     vanheta+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: vanhenisit
     vanheta+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: vanhenis
     vanheta+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: vanhenisima
     vanheta+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: vanhenisitta
     vanheta+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: vanhettais
     vanheta+V+Pass+Cond: vanhettais
     
     vanheta+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: vanhene
     vanheta+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: vanhekkaa
     
     vanheta+V+Act+Inf3+Ine: vanhenemassa
     vanheta+V+Act+Inf3+Ela: vanhenemasta
     vanheta+V+Act+Inf3+Ill: vanhenemhaan
     vanheta+V+Act+Inf3+Ade: vanhenemala
     vanheta+V+Act+Inf3+Abe: vanhenematta
